apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
<dictionary>
  <!-- Copyright 2010 Kevin Scannell and Phil Kelly -->
  <!-- Released under the same license as the apertium-ga-gv package -->
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÇabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzç</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/>

    <sdef n="ant"    c="Anthroponym"/>

    <sdef n="subj"   c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="obj"    c="Object"/>

    <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"     c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculine + feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="GU"     c="Gender Unknown"/>

    <sdef n="sp"     c="Singular + plural"/>
    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="com"    c="Common"/>

    <sdef n="cni"    c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="fti"    c="Future"/>
    <sdef n="ftr"    c="Future Relative"/>
    <sdef n="ger"    c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="past"   c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="pp"     c="Past Participle"/>

    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="pos"    c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="dem"    c="Determiner"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Mutations -->

    <pardef n="initial-a">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>h-a</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n-a</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>a</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-A">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>A</l>
          <r>A</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>h-A</l>
          <r>A</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hA</l>
          <r>A</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n-A</l>
          <r>A</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nA</l>
          <r>A</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>A</l>
          <r>A</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-b">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>w</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-bw">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>bw</l>
          <r>bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>w</l>
          <r>bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mw</l>
          <r>bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>bw</l>
          <r>bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-B">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>B</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>V</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>W</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>M</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>B</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-Bw">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Bw</l>
          <r>Bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>BW</l>
          <r>Bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>V</l>
          <r>Bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>W</l>
          <r>Bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Mw</l>
          <r>Bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>MW</l>
          <r>Bw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>BW</l>
          <r>BW</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-c">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>c</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-C">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>C</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Ch</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>CH</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>G</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>C</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-çh">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>çh</l>
          <r>çh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>çh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r>çh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>çh</l>
          <r>çh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-Çh">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Çh</l>
          <r>Çh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>J</l>
          <r>Çh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>H</l>
          <r>Çh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>Çh</l>
          <r>Çh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-d">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gh</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-D">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>D</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Gh</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>GH</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>N</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>D</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Danvargagh"><par n="initial-D"/><i>anvargagh</i><par n="fo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Doaragh"><par n="initial-D"/><i>oar</i><par n="e/agh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bwoailtagh"><par n="initial-bw"/><i>oailt</i><par n="e/agh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aachouyreyder"><par n="initial-a"/><i>achouyreyder</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Commishoon"><par n="initial-C"/><i>ommishoon</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Baisantagh"><par n="initial-B"/><i>aisantagh</i><par n="fo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Doonaght"><par n="initial-D"/><i>oon</i><par n="Doon/aght__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="doo-chliaghtey"><par n="initial-d"/><i>oo-chliaght</i><par n="t/ey__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="braggaid"><par n="initial-b"/><i>raggaid</i><par n="muc__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="anlught"><par n="initial-a"/><i>nlught</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cughlinagh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ughlinagh</i><par n="fo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Alsaashagh"><par n="initial-A"/><i>lsaash</i><par n="e/agh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Crimeeagh"><par n="initial-C"/><i>rimeeagh</i><par n="fo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Anglicaanaght"><par n="initial-A"/><i>nglicaanaght</i><par n="muc__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Bengaalagh"><par n="initial-B"/><i>engaal</i><par n="e/agh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bwoirrinagh"><par n="initial-bw"/><i>oirrin</i><par n="m/agh__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="çhymnaght"><par n="initial-çh"/><i>ymnaght</i><par n="muc__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="blaagheyder"><par n="initial-b"/><i>laagheyder</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="discreajagh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iscreajagh</i><par n="fo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="çhaghteraght"><par n="initial-çh"/><i>aghteraght</i><par n="muc__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="cadlagh"><par n="initial-c"/><i>adlagh</i><par n="fo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ard-vooadys"><par n="initial-a"/><i>rd-vooadys</i><par n="fys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Çhybbyrt"><par n="initial-Çh"/><i>ybbyrt</i><par n="muc__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Dominicagh"><par n="initial-D"/><i>ominic</i><par n="e/agh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Creestiaght"><par n="initial-C"/><i>reestiaght</i><par n="muc__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Austrailagh"><par n="initial-A"/><i>ustrail</i><par n="e/agh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="America"><par n="initial-A"/><i>merica</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bwoid"><par n="initial-bw"/><i></i><par n="bw/oid__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="druggeyder"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ruggeyder</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Catalonish"><par n="initial-C"/><i>atalonish</i><par n="muc__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="çhiaghtoo"><par n="initial-çh"/><i>iaghtoo</i><par n="fo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bwoaillee"><par n="initial-bw"/><i>oail</i><par n="bwoail/lee__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="baboon"><par n="initial-b"/><i>aboon</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Breesheydagh"><par n="initial-B"/><i>reesheyd</i><par n="e/agh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="carbey-hydraad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>arbey-hydraad</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Doonaghtagh"><par n="initial-D"/><i>oonaght</i><par n="e/agh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="anlheil"><par n="initial-a"/><i>nlheil</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="çhellurium"><par n="initial-çh"/><i>ellurium</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="doghanagh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>oghanagh</i><par n="fo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Adaue"><par n="initial-A"/><i>daue</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="barganey"><par n="initial-b"/><i>argan</i><par n="t/ey__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Burgoonagh"><par n="initial-B"/><i>urgoon</i><par n="e/agh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="carboan"><par n="initial-c"/><i>arboan</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ard-vainshtyr"><par n="initial-a"/><i>rd-vainshtyr</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Chummyn"><par n="initial-C"/><i>hummyn</i><par n="muc__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dooreydane"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ooreydane</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="çhaghterys"><par n="initial-çh"/><i>aghterys</i><par n="fys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="brick"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rick</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="clannee"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lann</i><par n="re/ee__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="Aishanagh"><par n="initial-A"/><i>ishan</i><par n="e/agh__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bwaane"><par n="initial-bw"/><i>aane</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Bantu"><par n="initial-B"/><i>antu</i><par n="fo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="astatçheen"><par n="initial-a"/><i>statçheen</i><par n="ee__n_m"/></e>
